Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202023-1603
Violations; penalty.

If any county treasurer neglects or refuses to render any account or settlement required by law, fails or neglects to account for any balance due the state, county, township, school district, or any other municipal subdivision, or is guilty of any other misconduct in office, the county board may forthwith remove the county treasurer from office, and appoint some suitable person to perform the duties of the county treasurer until a successor is elected or appointed and qualified.

Laws 1879, § 94, p. 380;

R.S.1913, § 5640;

C.S.1922, § 4967;

C.S.1929, § 26-1304;

R.S.1943, § 23-1603;

Laws 2018, LB786, § 6.

Turning over to successor certificates of deposit is not payment over of money. Cedar County v. Jenal, 14 Neb. 254, 15 N.W. 369 (1883).

In removal of county treasurer, county board must follow statutory provisions for removal of county officers, and judgment of ouster is necessary. State ex rel. Craig v. Sheldon, 10 Neb. 452, 6 N.W. 757 (1880).